skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<p><l>uni</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uni</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>UNi</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Uni</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Uni</l><r>U<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="/q__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>q</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qNi</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>QNi</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>q</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qNi</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>QNi</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>rA</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qByAm</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qBiH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>re</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qByAm</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qByaH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qByAm</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qByaH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>roH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>QNAM</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ari</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>roH</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qRu</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>q</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>qNi</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>QNi</l><r>q<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
